Utah statutes.
61-2g-305.   Expiration of license, certification, or registration.

(1)  An initial license, certification, or registration issued under this chapter expires on the expiration date indicated on the license, certificate, or registration.

(2)  A renewal license, certification, or registration issued under this chapter expires two years from the date of issuance.

(3) (a)  The scheduled expiration date of a license, certification, or registration shall appear on the license, certification, or registration document.

(b) (i)  The division shall mail a holder of a license, certification, or registration notice of its expiration to the last address stated on the division's records as the holder's current address.

(ii)  To be mailed a notice under this Subsection (3)(b), a holder of a license, certification, or registration shall provide to the division in writing the holder's current address.

(iii)  A holder's license, certification, or registration expires if not renewed by the holder notwithstanding whether the holder receives a notice of its expiration by the division under this Subsection (3)(b).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 289, 2011 General Session

